5 The Gladly doesn't officially open until this Saturday but they had a preview night for people (like myself) who work in the area.  Taking over in the spot that Ruth Chris used to occupy, I am looking forward to eating there often.    Of the small plates that they were serving, my favorites were the scallops and the duck.  Both were fantastic.  The one dish that I wasn't able to sample because it was grabbed almost as soon as it came out of the kitchen was the meatloaf.  Everyone that I talked to that tried it said it was the best dish that they tasted.  I also had the tuna and the chicken pate.  Both were good, but not great.    As for the drinks, I really enjoyed the Thai Margarita but once I tried their Manhattan, I was hooked.  It was by far the best Manhattan that I have ever had.  I also sampled the Salute, a gin and grapefruit drink, but didn't really care for it.  They had a number of other cocktails on the menu that they weren't serving that looked very good and I can't wait to go back and try a few.  Lastly, the service was just as good, if not better, than the food or the drinks.  The staff was very friendly and even though it was the first time I had ever been there, or anyone for that matter, I left feeling like a regular.  I can't wait for the official opening so that I can come back and try the meatloaf and some of the other cocktails on the menu.  Seeing as how I work next door, I have a feeling that this is going to be my new go to spot after work!
5 Tonight will be the official Grand Opening!  Good luck to The Gladly!  I was able to attend preview night and it was wonderful.  The staff was so friendly from the moment we walked in.  Thank you Tim, Aaron Amy, Nate and Nick and the rest of the team for a wonderful evening.  The atmosphere has a great vibe.  We were pleased to sample all of the offerings of food and drink.  Loved the Thai Margarita.  Tried octopus for the first time and I must say it was delicious.  The wings and scallops were amazing.  We will be regulars!
5 While we aren't parents of anything two legged (our two cats definitely qualify as in need of parental guidance but as any cat companion...no..you are NOT an owner...knows,  cats pretty much listen to the beat of their own drummer), we are thrilled when one of "our own" takes a leap into new territory and breaks new ground.  We could not be prouder than we are of The Gladly...the extension of the heart and soul of Bernie, Richie, and Andrew that opened (to the public) tonight. The place is amazingly urban but comfortable, the service was as if they had been in place for years, and the food was all Bernie.  Gladly is NOT Citizen Public House West....there are reminders and some duplication of the good kind....but mostly the food has different spins and twists. Having never broken the addiction to the original chopped salad, Peg and I split it.  She had the VIETNAMESE PEPPER SHRIMP tomato, sticky rice cake while I tried the PISTACHIO CHICKEN LIVER PATE toast, mustard, pickled onion, capers. Incredible. Sweet succulent shrimp with a wonderfully paired peppery goodness and tomato sweetness...and a pate which required more toast than a human really needs to eat in one sitting and just stupidly good.  Peg had the CHILLED ISOT CHILE TUNA* jicama pineapple pico de gallo, tamarind glaze, micro cilantro which was spot (not prawn) on, and I had the COFFEE CHARRED SHORT RIBS caramelized Gorgonzola barley, blueberry cumin compote,  Several excellent restaurants have excellent short ribs...but these had incredible balances between sweet and salty components and fall off the bone tenderness. While not typically dessert eaters, I decided to box probably half of the ribs (read  lunch of the OMG variety) and tried the PEACH CORNMEAL COBBLER fresh cream.  Very very good.  Our server was Tim and he was excellent...as were the other wait staff who were feeding my water addiction. It was such a joy to see the triumvirate of owners in addition to meeting Robin and Tim (yes, another one) who kept the place humming.  Although this is so obvious to be silly....Peg and I will return.....yeah yeah..ok  ok....Gladly!  BTW...our thoughts are with the soon to be new addition..as in baby girl variety....yeah GIna!!  Dr. B
4 A welcomed 360 experience, the Gladly staff, owners & chefs should be basking in the afterglow of a successful grand opening last night. Not having made reservations, my date and I were still warmly received and quickly accommodated by the hostess, even though, upon first entry, it appeared evident that chancing this could have upset their well-prepared flow of anticipated patrons.   Our waiter, Tim, showed genuine interest in our overall dining experience - taking the time on a busy grand opening night to give detailed & enticing recommendations, politely "interrupting" our conversations to "check in" (impeccable timing - ha!), and stepping in to make sure our smoked salmon salad was mixed "just so" - he alone would be a good reason to return.   Now, getting down to the purpose of our visit: sustenance. All plate presentations were nicely done. Our first course, the smoked salmon salad, turned out to be the highlight for me - a featured dish not listed on the menu, I can only hope to enjoy it again one day. It was a textured, colorful party for my taste buds (perhaps Tim's expert salad-tossing skills played a role in this? - ha!). The lamb riblets, chilled isot chile tuna & coffee charred short ribs were all unique blends of herbs & marinades, prepared near perfection. But I must say, the refreshing Moe'scow Mule (American Harvest organic spirit, Fever-Tree ginger beer, cucumber, lime, rocks) proved to be the perfect compliment. This beverage alone may just be the key ingredient for a future happy hour.   Well done, Gladly staff, management & owners. I wish you much success.
5 went here last night for my birthday dinner and loved it!    i was pretty surprised when ruth chris closed, but was relieved to know that the people behind one of my favorite restaurants, citizen public house, would be taking over the location.  they did a lot of remodeling which really updated the space and included a really awesome looking bar.     for only being their second day open, they seem to have everything running super smooth.  this is definitely going to be a regular spot for me.  we started with the sausage/brioche pretzel/cheese and thought it was delicious. i get super pumped whenever i see pretzel bread anything, so i was excited to try this app and wasn't disappointed.  next we tried the lamb riblettes, and they were great as well. when i go back i'd like to get the chopped salad since i'm obsessed with the one at cowboy ciao (one of the owners of the gladly, chef bernie kantak, created it).    for our main courses i had the short ribs which were tender and full of flavor. they're coffee charred and come with a blueberry compote on top that gives it a lot of complexity.  my fiancé had the filet mignon-a pretty classic dish that they cooked perfectly.    we had terrific service as well-generally when a restaurant first opens it can take the staff a few weeks to get the hang of all the menu items (totally understandable), but our server was totally on top of everything!   i highly recommend this new biltmore area restaurant-it's definitely going to be a local hot spot!
3 First off, we are HUGE fans of Citizen Public House and very much "foodies" so we were very excited to try The Gladly. Unfortunately, for the most part, we were disappointed. Not with the service or the trendy atmosphere... It was the food. And we tried a lot of it with multiple recommendations from the waiter.   1. Fondue (2 out of 5 stars)... Cheese was a 10, but the accoutrement was just meh. ESP the smoked pork butt which should have been the star. It was basically processed Canadian bacon cubed up.  2. Pecan smoked grilled vegetables (1 out of 5 stars). Weird rutabagas, parsnips and baby carrots with some weird chick pea pancake. Was supposed to have manchego cheese on it, but no dice. Not sure it would have helped.  3. Octopus salad (2 out of 5 stars). Octopus was good, but the overall flavor profile was WAY too aggressive. From the peppercorns to the bitter grapefruit. No beuno. We should have stuck to the chopped salad, but stupid us for trying something new.  4. The Pigstrami (5 out of 5 stars). The sandwich is Bomb! The pastrami is think cut, tender, some of the best I've ever had. Great cheese, rye bread and housemade ketchup for the fries. I'd come back for this.   Good beer selection, good drinks, but much better food at CPH. If you go and check out the Gladly, steer clear of the "misses" outlined above.
2 Not overly impressed. Restaurant forces you to valet for $5, food was decent but nothing amazing for the pricing. The Buttermilk Chicken, the chicken was dry and bland although the fingerling potatoes were pretty damn good. Meatloaf was dry and the rage sauce lacked the mushrooms it was supposed to have, the wild rice was way overcooked. Don't waste your time and stick to Citizens if you want a meal from this restaurant group.
5 My wife and I went there last weekend before a movie and we were quite impressed!  Katt was our server and was very attentive and knowledgeable on their menu.  We enjoyed the cheese fondue and the scallops which were superb!  We will definitely be back!
4 Came in on a Saturday night.  The new restaurant makes you forget that it was ever a Ruth's Chris.  The staff was kind and when we complained about the cold, they adjusted the temperature and checked in on us.  The place is spendy, and you will spend more than at CPH.  The cocktails are about 12-14 and listed more Absinthe and Pernod than I had seen in a while.  The Manhatten while served in a martini glass (so that it looks itty bitty) has enough alcohol in it to fell a buffalo. The appetizers include riblets and a wonderful avocado filled with goat cheese and roasted garlic.  Not something I see everywhere and delicious.  Had the octopus salad (which was good but not memorable, mostly octopus, grapefruit, mizuna and fennel bulb) and the classic chop which you can get at CPH and Cowboy Ciao.  But that salad is so good I find myself trying not to eat directly from the shared bowl.  The filet, scallops and ribs were all a hit.  The one miss was the meatloaf.  Was expecting it to be really homely and comforting, but found that one a bit dry.  Overall, will be coming back.  It's nice to have another fun restaurant option on the C.Corridor.  Going to get dessert next time too, but was too full!
5 Met friends for Happy Hour here. Love this place. Appetizers that we shared were delicious. The Buttermilk Chicken Breast  and potatoes entree was perfect. I did sample the Pork Loin -- Wow!!! Yes, this place is another fave. Cheers***
5 I am so excited The Gladly opened in our hood. The actual location isn't super--although we did walk there from the bar at Del Frisco's-  it feels a little like you're in a corporate-y building, but once you walk into the restaurant you forget about all that.   Our server, Aaron, was awesome! Really friendly and gave us guidance when we asked for it. We had the pork belly starter which was delicious and way less fatty than some I've had before. We then had the chopped salad. I get it-- the salad has a facebook page its so famous, but I didn't think it would be worth talking about. I mean, it's a salad. Well it proved me wrong. To die for. So good. I wouldn't be surprised if I'm drawn in to The Gladly for lunch to have that bad boy.  For entrees-- we tried the tuna, chicken and short ribs. All of which had interesting spices and flavor profiles-- all memorable. The short ribs were out of this world. As was the brussel sprout side dish.  Drinks- about half of our bill was on drinks, but that's likely because we splurged on a nice bottle of red with our meal, which Aaron helped us decide on. My mom and I had the Kim Crawford Sauvignon Blanc during our apps/salad and the hubs had a spicy marg which was really good.   Can't wait to go back. Definitely a repeat kinda place.
4 So we went for Arizona Restaurant Week and you should know, the appetizer and dessert are half portions.  The entrees seem to be full though.  The chopped salad is awesome.  I love it at CPH and its the same here.  My friend had the tomato bisque which is fine - just reminds me of Chef Boyardi ravioli sauce minus the little bits of "meat".  The chicken dish is awesome.  Its a bit small, and spicy but the potatoes definitely even it out.  I would definitely go back to have some more of that.  The meatloaf wasn't as impressive but its a solid and savory offering.  Definitely don't need ketchup.  :)  The peach cobbler had some grainy powder on it that I didn't care for.  Maybe they should've gone more for doughy crumbles versus the weird dry powdery crumble.  The creme fraiche had no flavor.  The bread pudding was much better.  Way better than a lot of other attempts that I have had.  I was sad to see Ruth Chris go, but was impressed with the redesign.  They might want to help visitors with the south entrance though, its a little disconcerting to walk through a glass door that almost looks like it should be locked and the place isn't open.  That leads down some stairs and leads you to a hallway with restrooms and a bar.  The hostess on the other side of the room so she doesn't see you when you walk in..  I kind of wonder if people are really walking in off Camelback?  Anyway, my rating would really be 3.5 but will round up for great service and nice atmosphere.
2 A tad bit disappointing...   My newest pet peeve is waiting for a table when I have reservations. A recent occurrence happened this weekend when I showed up five minutes early for my 830pm reservations and was finally seated at a table at 850pm. The accommodating hostess did present us with two glasses of rose, but when we sat down, we realized we weren't that special because everyone else around us were also served complimentary rose...   The meal was off to a decent start with the lamb riblettes and paprika cured pork belly. The glaze on the riblettes was slightly sweeter than my palette likes, but the flavor on the lamb was really wonderful. I was surprisingly pleased with the pork belly. I have gotten to the point where I swore off pork belly for so long because no one knew how to 'wow' with it. A fatty piece of pork can do well on its own, but I like to think the kitchen tried, and the staff here did an awesome job. I had also never had sarga turo, and really enjoyed it with the pork belly and golden beets. We were again slightly disappointed when a new couple sat next to us and was advised of a drink and entree special for the night that our server neglected to tell us.  The most disappointing part of the meal was the main course. We both ordered fish for our main since we had red meat for our appetizers. The yellowtail looked very dry as it was sat on the table, and its texture was the same. The chilled tuna was slightly better, but unimpressive.  My date later pointed out that the yellowtail served to our neighboring table was both cooked and plated much better.   I feel like this place has a lot of potential, but definitely has more room for improvement. I may give it another go, but I'd have to be convinced it can be done better next time.
1 Have been hearing about this new place opening up and decided to go try it out. Was told to make reservations or I'd be waiting for a table quite a while. So i did! Got there and was seated right away. Once there we were brought water (which warmed quite quickly as it was left on the table in a bottle). It was happy hour so we decided to order drinks and an appetizer (Fondue). It was awful... The cheese was cold and lumpy and the bead was burnt, pears had pieces of seeds in them that we had to pick out. Then after waiting another 25 minutes our order for dinner was taken, Our salad arrived (the Original Chopped Salad) which was the highlight of the night. It Was AMAZING! We then waited another 35 minutes for our dinner to finally arrive. What was laid before us was astonishing. It looked like 2 very small appetizers. I couldn't believe it. Then came the desert, It was tasteless and bland (peach cobbler/bread pudding). I was in SHOCK! So then we waited another 20 Minutes for the check, looked at it and nothing was priced as being advertised for the Happy Hour. Will NEVER return, check you receipt for price raising and avoid appetizers, main dishes and desserts. And bring ear-plugs as it is quite noisy too!
4 Came for AZ Restaurant Week with 3 friends. I agree with another reviewer about how it is a little disconcerting to come in from the south side. I wasn't sure I was in the right place at first and whether I should open the door or not. But I did get in and since I arrived early I ordered a drink at the bar. The bar seems fully stocked (although they don't carry coconut vodka) and I just ordered a standard Long Island iced tea. It was fine. I wasn't offered a glass of water with it however and had to ask for one. Although we were planning on ordering off of the Arizona restaurant week menu we also wanted to sample a couple of their regular appetizers. We decided to go with the brussels sprouts on a bed of sweet corn grits and the crabcakes. We all agreed afterwards just how good the brussels sprouts were. They ended up being one of our favorite dishes. The crabcakes were okay and in my opinion nothing to write home about. For my restaurant week's selections I chose the chopped salad, the scallops, and the bread pudding. I loved the chopped salad. It was like nothing that I have ever had before. I loved the couscous and the currants. Those and the pinion nuts really made the dish. The scallops were served on a bed of the sweet corn grits and they were absolutely to die for. There was four of them on the plate but I only ended up eating two as I knew that I still had dessert coming. The cola gastrique drizzled over the top was absolutely amazing and really added a lot to the taste. The buttermilk bread pudding that I selected for the dessert was exceptionally good. The blueberry compote added just the right amount of sweetness to it and the ice cream added just the right amount of velvety creaminess. One of the people I was with ordered the peach cobbler and I was able to taste hers and I have to admit that I'm glad I ordered the bread pudding. I thought it was much better than her peach cobbler. The other entrée ordered at our table was the meatloaf. It was a huge hunk of meat on a bed of risotto with mushroom ragout and although it was good, I don't think it was as good as the scallops. Service was good and our waiter, Nathan, was very nice and accommodating (as well as easy on the eyes according to my one friend!).  So in closing I would like to say we all thoroughly enjoyed our dinner and I will definitely be back with hubby!
5 I am gladly giving five stars for Chef Bernie Kantak's brand new restaurant located on the Camelback Corridor in the old Ruth's Chris location... I don't get out quite as often as I used to now that I have two little ones at home, so when I do get out, I like to try new places.  Such was the case this past Sunday when my mother-in-law offered to babysit so we could have a date night of sorts.  Jared and I ended up at The Gladly for a very memorable meal.  Since it was a spontaneous date, we arrived here without realizing that it was Arizona Restaurant Week, but that being said, we received even more bang for our buck!    We were super impressed with the remodel of the restaurant... it's got a great modern atmosphere with a fabulous looking bar, an elevated semi-private dining room and a more secluded banquet room in the works.  There will also be patio seating we were told.  Nathan was our server and he was friendly and attentive, as was the rest of the staff.  But the food was what really shined for us... Be forewarned, what comes next in this review is A WHOLE LOT of food.  We ate most of it too!    Chef Bernie told us that "people go bananas for the pate," and he was right... we dug in so quickly when it arrived to our table, that I forgot to snap a picture, but the presentation was beautiful.  It's served with toast, pickled onions, mustard and capers and the pate itself is in a small mason jar.  Next up, we had an order of the lamb riblettes.  I think these were the highlight for me... seriously amazing.  I'm still thinking about them several days later!  For our salad course, Jared went with the famous "Original Chopped Salad," and I decided to mix it up and try the Roasted Cauliflower Caesar.  I believe both were smaller portions for the restaurant week menu, but they were still plenty big for us and we were happy with our respective choices - both fresh and tasty.  By this point, I was pretty full, but I made room for the additional side we ordered of brussels sprouts and grits.  Mmmmm!  My entree was the only thing that wasn't amazing.  I had the yellowtail and it was overcooked.  I probably would have sent it back, but I was too stuffed by this point.  Jared had the scallop entree and cleaned his plate!  Dessert offerings on the restaurant week menu were peach cornmeal cobbler and buttermilk bread pudding.  We ordered one of each and ended on a sweet note.  Just like sister restaurant Citizen Public House, Chef Bernie partnered with Andrew and Richie on The Gladly, and it appears they've done it again... another fabulous restaurant has been added to the Valley dining scene.  We can't wait to return.  I suggest you go as well; you'll be GLAD you did!
3 Right away I did not care for The Gladly. I made reservations during restaurant week to ensure a spot for our first visit. When we arrived they seated us at the worst possible table right near the entrance breezeway amidst all the door traffic. I thought reservations got priority seating. Since the table was so easily overlooked ..It took forever for a server to arrive and take our drink order.   Thank goodness our server did rise to the occasion. We switched tables and he placed our food orders very quickly. I will say -  the scallops were to die for and the sweet corn grits were superb! High five on that one, Gladly :-) Now everything else just wasn't that great.   Had the inventive cauliflower salad to start.  Not good at all. Bland as bland can be and reeked terribly of .. well.. something that it shouldn't. And my guest's bisque soup was more of a chunky mashed purée. We both ordered peach cobbler for dessert and the grainy texture wasn't too bad. But the sweet cream didn't hit the spot and the dish overall needed perhaps some cinnamon or some ice cream with vanilla bean to draw out flavor.   I have to add that it took an awkward gap of several minutes (millenia!)  between each course to bring in the next dish.  Thanks to my glass of wine and the server who really did the best he could, the meal wasn't a complete disaster. Still - it was not a good first impression from the seating, to the flow of the meal, to the meh-tasting food.
4 Pretty good. The pepper shrimp are quite delicious. Have to go back more and maybe I will upgrade to 5 stars.
4 We decided to got to The Gladly for restaurant week. I'm so glad we did! My boyfriend wasn't sure if he wanted to select off of the menu for restaurant week but after looking at it, it was a no brainer! We both decided to start with The Original Chopped Salad (same as Cowboy Ciao), how can you go wrong with this salad!? AMAZING. Then he had the Buttermilk Chicken Breast and I had the Pan Seared Scallops. The chicken had such great strong flavors that worked really well with each other and the scallops were the best I've ever eaten! The desserts they had to choose from were the Peach Cornmeal Cobbler and the Buttermilk Bread Pudding. Since there were two to choose from and two of us this was a no brainer and do one of each and share. Both were very good, but I did enjoy the Buttermilk Bread Pudding a tad more.   I highly suggest stopping in and doing a dinner date night!
5 I am so GLAD to have gone to Gladly, having gone from other positive Yelper reviews.  The place had an open contemporary open feel.  Staying at the bar for Happy Hour was a nice way to enjoy all the goodies during Happy Hour.  The Happy Hour fare were well portioned and not skimpy plates.  The hibiscus drink was so good- not too sweet, just enough vodka and good for a second round.  We had a pretty good mix of different variety of foods, all of which were impeccably prepared, even down to the last green olive in the roasted vegetable platter.  I never eat pate, but decided to give the chicken spread a try which was a smooth combo with the homemade mustard, capers and bits of procuitto.  Who thought brussell sprouts on top of grits could taste that good?  They paid attention to how it the food was cooked, grilled or roasted, and the cooks brought out the natural flavor of each dish with minimal sauces and complimentary oil and spices to the highest level of attention.  This is on our list of places to return too.
5 My sister and I ate dinner here for the first time last night and were completely impressed in every aspect! We were immediately greeted by cordial staff and didn't have to wait very long to be seated (although we did have a reservation). Our server was Shane, a guy who is clearly a baller. He was sweet, funny and answered all of my asinine questions about the myriad of items I didn't recognize on the menu. He happily recommended we get this cray cray drink that had ROCK CANDY in it. Like a stick of rock candy. It was fucking adorable! Naturally I took several pictures of this drink like a badass nerd. I would post it on here, but I am super lazy. Anyway, we ended up ordering the duck ramen soup and the blue cheese steak salad with a side of fries for our meals. It all came out pretty quickly, which was good, because those rock candy dranks were quite strong and I needed food in my belly. The duck ramen soup was amazing! It was spicy, flavorful, and made me feel like a warm toasty marshmallow. I loved it. My sister's salad was also really bomb. Hey, did you know they make their own ketchup? Well now you do. You can tell too, it tastes amazing! We finished off our meals with the ice cream cones. You get 2 little ones that are perfect for sharing. We got the bourbon cherry ice cream with dried cherries on the side. Not surprisingly, it too tasted great. Everything was moderately priced and I felt the portion sizes were proportionate to the cost. Overall, it was a really great evening. Everyone was super upbeat and friendly and the vibe of the place is very chill. Not too staunch, not too laid back, just right. Well done, friends.  Oh and the music? Whoever is selecting that, I love you. Is that awkward? Please play more Wagon Christ. :) It makes me click my heels together in mid-air.
5 I really love their other restaurant  -  Citizen Public House - in Scottsdale.  Was delighted to see that they did it again. Totally different vibe.. In a great way. Our waitress Kat was very attentive and knowledgable. We asked what was really good and different for an appetizer and the recommended the pistachio infused chicken liver pâté'. OMG! Anything liver usually scares me! This was to die for! Our main dinner selections were equally fabulous. My meatloaf was amazing!   I can see there are a few bum reviews on Yelp, but I'm sure The Gladly will work out the bugs.. They have only been open for a month.  I will highly recommend to my friends and will definitely be back. Chef Bernie and he rest of the gang have it going on!
2 Tried during Fall 2013 Restaurant Week and wasn't really a fan.    I had:  Cauliflower Salad  Buttermilk Chicken  Peach Cobbler   My boyfriend WAS a fan of his food--and of my chicken.  My biggest comment here is that the peach cobbler has GOT to go...or at least be renamed.  It bears no resemblance to a cobbler.  Officially the first time I've EVER thought, "I hope peach season ends soon so that something else will go on the menu."
4 Go to Gladly! We went last night with a party of 6 and tried many of the innovated and delicious dishes.   Best appetizer - brussels sprout over creamy delicious grits (yum). Also enjoyed the chicken pate. Note- the shrimp was good but is large enough to be an entree.   Best entree - chilled tuna (perfection) with jicama and pineapple. Coffee crusted shortribs are yum but a small warning, they are seriously rich. The scallops showcased from sister restaurant Citizen are just as delicious both places.   Our drinks were all delicious. Recommend the Thai margarita, the manhattan and the house draft negroni.   Just the be balanced we should mention 2 things. 1- the noise level is extreme and we had to yell just to hear people at our own table. 2- we called to say we would be 10 minutes late and they said they had our table booked again 75 minutes after our reservation. I don't think so! I promptly told them there was no way we would be done that quickly and weren't in the mood to be rushed. Needless to say, once we were there we weren't rushed and the service was excellent.   We will go again and next time save room for dessert! Ice cream cones I read about in other reviews sound delightful and creative. The menu doesn't really say- just says ice cream cone. Next time I'm in!
3 I had high expectations for The Gladly but was a little disappointed.  I went there last week for Happy Hour to meet a girlfriend of mine.  I was greeted right away by the hostess and told her I was just going to have a seat at the bar.  The bar is a very large wrap around area and there were at least 3 or 4 bartenders.  I was again greeted right away by a bartender and received my glass of wine.  The wine list is very long but if you are a Chardonnay drinker, there are only 3 selections by the glass which I found to be a little disappointing.  My friend arrived and she received her glass of wine right away.  That is when all the service stopped.  She finished her glass first and finally got a second one upon asking.  When I finished mine, the bartenders walked by too many times to not ask if I'd like to have another.  It's not that they couldn't have seen that it was empty, especially when they are standing in front of you, talking to other guests or washing glasses and setting out clean ones.  I finally had to motion to get his attention and request another glass of wine.  We were planning on getting appetizers but were never given the opportunity to do this.  We had menus in front of us but they disappeared during our first glass of wine, never to appear again and we were never asked if we wanted anything to eat.    Now, I cannot comment on the quality of the food but all the food that everyone around us had looked great and the gentleman next to me said that his Pigstrami was fantastic.  Sadly, I didn't get a chance to even order anything.  After we were totally ignored we finished our glasses, leaving with amazement that were actually treated that way.  I may try them again because I like to give second chances and I'd like to try the food.   Hopefully this was a off night for all the bartenders behind the bar but I'm just not so sure.
4 Had an excellent lunch here last Friday.  I was supposed to meet here and couldn't think of where it was.  It's the old Ruths Chris steakhouse location.  They have updated the inside and it is open and airy for lunch.  The food was awesome.  I had the steak salad which was really good.  2 others had their chopped salad and both loved it.  Another had the fish tacos and was delighted with the recommendation.    The servers were all attentive and really made sure we were taken care of.    I will definitely be going back in the future.  I would like to try their dinner menu and wine list.  I'll let you know...
5 My husband and I celebrated our 17th anniversary here! We loved the atmosphere and the service is awesome! We are raving fans of Citizens Public House so knowing that they own Gladly, it was a must try! If you work in the area, check out the Happy Hour! Fun place to hang out and great bites not to mention very cool cocktails! The only thing I like better at Citizens is that is not as quite and my favorite bartender isn't there! Lol! Definite got to go!
5 I am so pleased with The Gladly! I'm a big fan of its sister restaurant, Citizen Public House, and The Gladly didn't disappoint either. We came in for restaurant week, fortunately I had made a reservation, so despite being totally full, our party of 6 was seated right away! Great service!   As for food, they have a few dish repeats from Citizen, but over all I think the menu was even more varied. I had the seared Tuna, which was delicious! I had ordered it rare, but it came out medium. No biggie, at least it wasn't over cooked, but that may have been the only fault of the night. The garbanzo cake the fish came with was incredible! So much flavor!!! With only a bit of spicy kick.   I'm really glad they have the famous chopped salad from Citizen, so of course that didn't fail to please! They were also very accommodating to my dairy allergy needs.   The actual restaurant is very hip, inside I actually felt like was transported to a chic restaurant in New York........ fabulous!!!! I can't wait for my next dinning experience at The Gladly.
5 Clearly they have done it again. I am an avid fan of the Citizen Public House and The Gladly is a beautiful addition to the Biltmore Corridor. I could go on and on about the food and the service, but you will experience this for yourself when you get there. Tim and Aaron truly made this experience an unforgettable first visit. The food was nothing short of spectacular and the drinks were top notch. Simply put, this dinner made me want to loose my manners.
4 Let's start with the place. Beautiful. Open, comfortable. The bar is also great. I was waiting at the bar and saw a lot of people having fondue, very elaborated hand crafted cocktails and having a great time.  When my party arrived we tried several dishes. All of them really good. I was hoping to try the pork belly but nobody voted for that. I'll be back soon to try it, the fondue and the "super yummy nuts".  The chopped salad was very good and very unique in flavor and texture.  The duck ramen was tasteful and with a final spicy kick. Just be aware, it's a large serving.   The wild fiji tuna was also very good.  The balsamic meatloaf was original and tasteful but again, be aware, the serving is very large. I would order it without the rice or it would be good a creamy grana padano risotto, but that's just my preference.  My favorite dish was the tomato soup. Hands down.  Bread pudding was tasteful and the smoke tea chocolate pot the creme was pretty unique. I liked it but if you don't like smoky tastes, this is not for you.   A great addition to the neighborhood.  Cheers
4 Really happy the Gladly is now open for lunch! It is nice to have a version of Citizen opened on the other end of Camelback.  Their menu is very different than Public House, but they keep the same ideas and of course they kept the classic chop salad, which is my all time favorite.   The food here is really good - I have yet to try some of the interesting dishes on the menu, but can't wait!
5 Fantastic food for picky, well-traveled eaters! The brussel sprouts are the best we've ever had, meat-loaf and short ribs are not to be missed!!!  Our waiter Phillip was so fun, very knowledgable about the menu and wines, and now our new best friend!  The craft cocktails are to die for... We tried many! ;)  We will be back!
5 I really liked this place.  My friend took me here when I was visiting.  I can say that it rivals and surpasses many of the best L.A. restaurants.  Not bad, Phoenix!  We arrived a bit early (I am not sure if they have valet parking but it's easy to park up the ramp or on the street.    Able to snag a bar seat we each had a cocktail.  I opted for the Thai Margarita: Patrón silver tequila, galangal & kaffir lime simple syrup, tamarind reduction, Thai chili sea salt, basil, lime, rocks whilst my friend had a glass of white wine.  Service was pleasant and quick and the cocktail was absolutely delicious.  Shortly after closing out and taking our first sip we were seated at a table with one side a booth and the other a chair.  Aaron was our server, warm and welcoming asking if we had dined there before and explaining things and offering suggestions.  We had time so we started off with the appetizer feature which was mind blowing:  bread, house made pork rinds with a zesty sauce, and basically bacon fat butter in layman's terms.  It was smooth, spreadable, and I wanted more than the modest dollop on the far too large plate.  Next we tried the Duck Ramen.  The duck was cooked just right but to be honest I just don't think I am a Duck person.  I found it to be too thick and a bit fatty, spitting out part of it discreetly.  I loved the flavors in the soup though and the noodles were not overcooked at all.  The soup contains: five-spice duck ham, ramen noodles, pea greens, soy bean sprouts, spicy miso broth   For our mains we decided to split both the scallops (seared just right, flavored expertly, and over grits.  Amazing and fresh (they must fly in seafood daily)  We also split the Ribs feature, a special which was mind blowing and I forget all the ingredients but just know it was savory, with the meat soft on the inside with a crisp outer layer.    We got another round of cocktails including the "Berried Alive" which was very sweet and garnished with a stick of rock candy.    At times our cocktails were empty and some of the bus boys were eager to clear not yet finished plates  but our glasses were full and overall I was truly pleased with the pace of our dinner and I felt like the price was right for two people.  For all the food and the 2 rounds of drinks including tip it was $ 133.
5 We were pleasantly surprised by the ease of parking, beautiful ambience and the food was delicious.  I say its a five star because the price was very reasonable for the quality of the dishes.
5 The Gladly - this is it, my favorite new spot. This restaurant hits on so many different cylinders it's ridiculous. First and foremost, I love myself some Citizen Public House. Now with The Gladly being around, it's a conflict on which of the two we should visit when it's up for discussion.  The ambiance inside of The Gladly differs from CPH which is nice, with large glass windows that give it a more elegant vibe - I would argue that CPH is slightly more intimate. Pick your poison, folks. Intimate or elegant - either way it's amazing.   The bar flows similarly as well with the large square seating arrangement - but the whiskey selection at The Gladly is incredible and takes things to the next level. Cocktails are above just about every other restaurant in the area as far as quality, taste, and creativity in my opinion - well done Richie Moe and staff.  Menu selections differ nicely from the Public House offerings but still keep to that inventive, yet classic comfort style of cuisine that I've come to love and appreciate from the sister restaurant.   I cannot recommend The Gladly highly enough. Great cocktails, great food, and great service. Bing, bang, boom - it's all you need.
4 Great new addition to the Biltmore area!  I knew it had to be good when I heard it was the same group that did Citizen Public House!  Amazing service, great decor/atmosphere, lively crowd, and delicious food.    We started with the roasted brussel sprouts over grits - truly amazing...bursting with flavor and the grits were ridiculously creamy.  I enjoyed the chicken...moist and amazingly flavorful - only wish it was served with a veggie too!  My husband tried the meatloaf and was pleased with his choice...not amazing, but solid.  Looking forward to coming back for happy hour at the bar sometime to enjoy one of the martinis that looked so good!
5 I have only multiYelped a restaurant on a few occasions, and when I do, it is because it continues to excel in the areas of most importance....service, food, and attitude of the place. Peg and I visited the Gladly tonight. I have showed remarkable restraint because we have been several times between the maiden Yelp and this one....but I just felt compelled to redux it. THe usual incredible pistachio and chicken liver pate and chopped salad are always on the order as appetizers, starters, whatever/whenever. The octopus salad was a wonderful treat and imminently splitable. Can't go wrong, wonderful, end of story. Tonight Peg had the Vietnamese shrimp which was so flavorful and spicy and sooo on point. I had  a pork chop on top of a lovely cloud of hominy mash/grits and served with a green chili verde.  It elevated the other white meat to an-other level of taste.  Chef Bernie created a white chocolate &  goat cheese cake with  lemon citrus sorbet topped with  cardamom and orange and a fig jam that was incredible. Don't ever be afraid to smell (or taste) what he has put together. Incredible combination!  We had a very skilled and personable server, Kat, who took us through the meal with poise and a wonderful personality. It is always a pleasure to go to this place and explore the new creations.  If you haven't been,,,a strong recommendation to check it out!   Dr. B
5 New in Phoenix. Don't miss this one   It was good from the beginning.  Sat down immediately, great waiter in Nathan. He made some interesting recommendations including their signature salad. We had tuna and the pork chop. Both were exceptional. The restaurant has a great aesthetic.  Bar area is nicely appointed. Did not disappoint. A must try experience.
5 Great place to try new drinks and if you scotch lover prepare to get impressed!!
5 Wow, what a phenomenal dining experience.  I went here with some friends for a going away dinner, as it was on my list to try before fleeing the desert.  Tim, our server, gave superb service, going above and beyond what I ever could have expected.  Even Richie Moe himself came over to our table to demonstrate making an ice ball for whiskey.  PS, you should totally get the ice ball, they have this contraption that makes a crystal clear ball of ice for your whiskey, right at your table.    The service alone really deserves 5 stars, but then the food!  Fantastic.  My fiance and I  started with the fondue, then we had the short ribs and a burger.  We finished with the goat cheesecake, which was amazing.  The rest of our party loved their food as well, and  I sampled quite a few of people's cocktails and desserts - they were all fantastic.   Speaking of cocktails, this is the place.  I have been wanting to try a negroni for awhile, but I was afraid to try one that might be less than stellar.  I knew this was the place to try one, as they actually have them on tap!  My fiance tried a Manhattan for the first time, and he loved it.  Really, all of the cocktails are  awesome.  This is a rare find in Phoenix, I highly recommend it.
2 This place was extremely disappointing. The chopped salad was the only good thing.. Everything else had a similar "smoked" flavor that wasn't good. Don't get the olives, tomato soup, mixed nuts, etc. Maybe it needs a little more time to get the kitchen up to par but this was no where near as good as citizen public house and I hear they are the same owners.
5 As a life long avoider of Brussels sprouts you can imagine my surprise when I found myself outrightly embarrassing myself on a first date DEVOURING them (happy hour menu even). Though admittedly they didn't hold near the charm of the drink menu or the staff. The bartender was an exceptional wingman.. The bow street a great conversation piece, and combined I'm not sure why I'd go anywhere else. Here's to hoping the hipsters and the scene kids don't hear about this place :)
4 i went here with a couple of girlfriends for a 'girls night' dinner. solid place for a date night dinner. the ambiance is loungy and relaxing, lowly lit, and comfy. it is also the kind of place that you take someone that you want to impress but not have to drop too much cash like you would at other "new american" restaurants in the area.   i liked the entree options (ribs, scallops, tuna, and quite a few pork dishes) and also was intrigued by the cocktail selection. looks like they have a lot of unique cocktails that would be great to try. i had the tuna and it was prepared perfectly medium rare. i loved the avocado tzatziki that came with it. it was light and airy but had a lot of flavor. i only wish there was more of it on the plate.  i think the service was the only less than stellar thing at this place. while our waiter was nice, he wasn't really all that attentive and only came back once to refill drinks/take drink orders. we also wanted to check out dessert but unfortunately he forgot to bring the dessert menu and just brought us our check.  it was busy even on a Monday so i would definitely get reservations if you'd like to check this place out. i may be back for a little happy hour cocktail exploration but not too sure about a full dining experience again.
5 Huge thumbs up for the Gladly. I also was a big fan of Citizen Public House, and was excited to check out the Gladly. I am especially pleased with the location in the Camelback corridor.   The interior is light, open and modern. Acoustically, it isn't bad, and we thought it was ok for our large group.  The cuisine is modern American- great favorites (i.e. meatloaf) updated for 2013+  I had the Coffee Charred Short Ribs, and they were every bit of savory and delicious. My dining companion had the scallops, which were also delicious.   The bar is impressive and true to Citizen Public House fashion, the bartender was able to whip up great concoctions.   For Dessert: we had the Smoked tea chocolate de Crème (chocolate pot): smoked tea was an interesting twist, and I would GLADLY order it again.
4 A great new addition to the Biltmore area.  Very comfortable spot, a relaxed, casual atmosphere.  Excellent food!  Try the Brussel sprouts, and the smoked olives.  And do not miss the chopped salad.   I will be back.
2 I had the roast pork and it wasn't very good and not at all what I expected.  The pork was two small thin steaks and was super fatty.  It had a smokey flavor that I didn't care for.  The mashed potatoes had a similar smokey flavor that I didn't like.  The carrots were good. I was expecting more of a tender fall off the bone braised pork roast.  The service was ok and I liked the atmosphere.
5 Love this restaurant! I get lunch here a couple times a month and wish I had time to get back down there for dinner! The Pigstrami is by far my favorite sandwich.....EVER!
5 Loved it. Fantastic, fresh food. Good, cute waitstaff and nice setting. Pistachio chicken pâté was awesome and caprese salad delish!
3 The good and the bad about The Gladly.  The Gladly is a very stylish and upscale restaurant in a prime location in the Biltmore Area. It occupies the building of an old Ruth Chris location and the menu ambiance and design do a good job of replacing what once existed in its place..  My Experience: tonight I was seated precisely at 8:15 PM, I wanted a cocktail and was waiting for Someone to take our drink order, by 8:33 (almost 20 mins later) I had to call someone to find our server. This person apologized, took our drink order and comped our drinks. Apparently someone had neglected to notify our server that we were there. Bad start. Once our server got to us, he took control of things and took our order for dinner.  Per our servers recommendation I ordered the Wagyu burger and it was outstanding. It was cooked to medium perfectly as I requested and the Wagyu beef was Very tender and very flavorful. 5/5 for the burger. My friend had the original chopped salad, I tasted that and it too was excellent.    When it came time to order desert I asked if the apple tart was served warm, and our server advised that it was. When the tart came out it was as cold as anything that just came out of a refrigerator.  So they made another one, same thing, ice cold. Obviously their method of warming up a pre made refrigerated desert doesn't work well, so they replaced that with the bread pudding. The bread pudding was top notch. I enjoyed every bite of that and would order it again if I came back.   My friend had the Chocolate Pot de creame and we both agreed that was mediocre at best. All in all the food was good, a couple missteps but still good. The service started off bad but Phillip turned that around so I'm giving them 3 stars. I think I'm going to re visit for lunch or happy hour and the rating could increase if some of the issues I had today are corrected by my next visit.
4 My husband and I had a very good dinner here on 12/19/13 to celebrate our anniversary.  We started with The Original Chopped Salad from Cowboy Ciao which is perfection.  I had the scallops which were incredible and he had the duck meatloaf, which was delicious!  Also, the cocktails were terrific and had a great presentation.  The vibe is good, albeit more casual that I anticipated.  The entrance is a little funky and confusing but once you're in, the dining experience is great.
5 I typically don't do reviews but I felt compelled to express my gratitude for a great evening with my family at the Gladly.  The Gladly provided the best service and food for our whole family.  Upon first impression, I was concerned that the Gladly would be tough to accommodate for my four year old son.  I couldn't have had a worse assumption.  During the course of our meal they presented three different entree options for my son.  It was apparent that they wanted to make sure that his food was as pleasing as the adults.  The cocktail list was top-notch and all of the entrees were impeccably prepared.  I would definitely go back on a date with the wife and would look forward to another dinner with the whole family.  The staff went ABOVE and BEYOND to make my son feel welcome and taken care of for the evening.  Big kudos should go to Kat our waitress and Sarah our hostess.
3 We dined at the Gladly lastnight. Excited to try something, "NEW" from this already trusted restaurant group I have to say we were pretty disappointed. I'll start by saying that the ambiance was great. Not too loud, just the right amount of hustle an bustle you expect from a trendy new place. We started at the bar for a cocktail after the hostess who was very polite and courteous let us know it would be about 10 minutes. The bartender was very personable and was smiling and helpful with questions regarding a couple cocktails I was interested in. I ordered the Farmers Punch and it was exceptional, well shaken and balanced. We also had the Sazerac and it too was very good.The hostess approached shortly after we got our drinks and indicated which table she would be taking us to and asked if that was ok which it was. After we were seated we were greeted by Tim who was great! Very professional and clearly good at his job as well as with people. The not so great part of the night was the menu. We were sad to see that the menu was virtually the same as CPH. Same proteins with the prep and platings switched up does not a new menu make. We started with the Mac & Cheese as it's one of my faves from CPH and we also had the Ahi Tuna which was a different menu item that we loved, great flavor combinations and so unexpected, Kudos on this one Chef. I ordered the chicken breast as it was a different preparation but when it came to the table it was overcooked and dry. Tim immediately took care of it and I ordered thed crab cakes instead, did not like the GF prep on these the millet gives a not so great aftertaste. My date had the coffee charred short ribs and they were good but not outstanding, again better at CPH.   The new and different items just didn't stand out among the rest of the familiar menu.  In essence the menu and flavor profiiles did not take me to a NEW restaurant. I truly feel this is just CPH Biltmore and we live much closer to CPH so we will save the drive.
5 Loved it! My friends and I met for happy hour on a Friday. We stayed for 4 hours. Service was great, food was better and wine exceptional.  If you love red wine, the Los Dos is my new favorite.   The brussel sprouts were perfect.  I will definitely be back!
4 I can say two things about The Gladly:  1) I detest the name, "The Gladly".  It's grammatically incorrect, there is no such thing as "the gladly", and just because you rent a space on Camelback doesn't make it ok.  "Irregardless", according to Oxford, is now a word.  Not to me.  2) the BLUE CHEESE STEAK SALAD...is so good, I'm willing to ignore the grammatical error in the restaurant name.  The menu says: "baby kale & field greens, Point Reyes blue dressing, bourbon soaked cherries, sweet potato chips {gf}$16".  The amount of steak you receive is generous...and delicious!  Nice bartender, prompt, efficient, I'll go back.  Nice job.
4 Went on NYE! Richie runs a great place. Service was  a little slower than had hoped for , but great food! Solid drinks, great portions sizes, great flavors! Will be back!
4 I was a little cynical about going to the establishment that replaced my best friends beloved Ruths Chris for which I have heard belly aching about since Ruths closed this location. However I was pleasantly surprised by my dining experience there last week and have added it to my list of places that I would be thrilled to go any time I get the opportunity.  I will try lunch at some point, but for dining, this was the perfect place to go and catch up with some old friends while enjoying a truly delicious meal.    I hate brussel sprouts.  Growing up my mother would boil brussel sprouts in the kitchen, filling the house with a pungent, disgusting smell that stuck with me for thirty years.  The Gladly offered a game changer for me with their Brussel Sprout and grits appetizer.  WOAH baby this stuff was absolutely fantastic and proved to me that it was not the vegetable that was repulsive to me, just the preparation by my mother (love you mom!).    Next was the Chopped Salad... no description, just an address to the facebook page for the Chopped Salad.  My advice, don't ask any questions... just get it, you will not regret my recommendation.  Mind blown.  The main course, the scallops sounded incredible, but so did the short ribs.  Recently I was at dinner with a few friends at the Citizen Public House, same owners as the Gladly, and one of our friends had the short ribs there.  They let me had a taste and although I loved the meal I was having at CPH, I knew that I would have enjoyed the short ribs a little more.  When given the same opportunity at the Gladly, I went for the short ribs and they were extraordinary.  The mean slipped right off the bone and the taste was just wonderful.  I did have the tart for dinner, but I was too stuffed to really enjoy it much.  It was not bad at all, I was just enthralled with the rest of the meal that I couldnt even think much about the desert.  I will save more room next time.    On another note, if you like scotch or whiskey, then you will love their selection.  If you are offered an ice ball with the scotch, take it, even if you typically have it neat, definitely do the ice call, the experience alone is worth it.
1 Went to the glady with high expectations and was 'gladly' let down! I was made To feel like a interference, unwanted and a nuisance. By both management and the staff. I had to ask management twice for something but every thing was cool.. No concern at all. The shaved headed bartender was never there and could care if we where there at all.  Said thanks for coming with his bacK to us.( first thing he said to us all night that considering I I was greeted with a eyebrows raise a no words instead of "hi) weak and weak. You can overcome a bad food experience but not a bad service one ( cant believe your related To citizen! The the food was ho hum but the sazerace was great. Too bad it won't make up for how sucky I was treated .. Want the package don't go. You'll be disappointed. Sorry to the pretentious bald Headed bartender who missed his bartending competition at his own place that should lose anyway for being indifferent to his guest. Sucked sucked sucked. Go some where else in the Biltmore for A great time!
5 This place was great! Went with some friends for a few drinks at the bar and the service was excellent. The bartender would check in every so often to see if we needed anything. After we were done drinking he gave us some water and made sure we never ran dry.  The decor and lighting looked really nice as well. The look of this place felt relaxed and chill. We didn't get any food because we ate at a different place before hand, buy might have to come back another time and try their food.
4 Loved the atmosphere.  Had an amazing dinner on our last visit.  Haven't been back in a while, though, mostly owing to the fact that the menu was primarily meat-based.  I'm sure we'll find our way back for a drinks sometime soon, though!
5 I would gladly come here (wink, wink, see what I did there?) anytime. It's so refreshing to have a restaurant in the Biltmore area that actually offers a late-night menu (11pm-1am). For a while, it seemed like all late-night restaurants were in downtown Scottsdale or downtown Phoenix. I didn't realize it was the culinary spawn of a former Cowboy Ciao chef until the menu showed a Facebook URL for the chopped salad. So happy I can get the chopped salad so close to home.   The first time I went here was with two girlfriends. We shared a brussel sprout appetizer which was very yummy. It comes on some very creamy grits, which became a favorite. They come with the scallops, an entree I would recommend. I had the duck ramen which is now been changed to a mussel ramen (duck too expensive?). That was fine but nothing really beats traditional ramen. So, in hindsight I would have tried something more American, which is why my last time eating at The Gladly, I had the duck meatloaf. There was enough for two meals! Loved the texture and you could taste the duck in every bite and it comes with a foie gras mousse and grilled asparagus. That time, my brother had the special rib-eye which was 18 oz (!). That turned out to be $48. So bear in mind, The Gladly is good for if you are OK to splurge.   As for dessert, I would recommend the blueberry bread pudding. It wasn't dense and it didn't left me overly stuffed like the entrees. I also had their chocolate creme dessert which is VERY decadent. Might be better to share that.   I also recommend hitting the late night menu, not just for the food but for the company. A lot of the patrons are people who work at nearby restaurants. So I found myself having great chats with a bartender at Capitol Grille and a manager at Christopher's Crush. You get an insider's look at the Valley restaurant scene and great options for food. My favorite was the crispy chicken skin banh mi. SOOOOOO Tasty! It literally was all chicken skin. Hoping they bring it back around for a turn!
3 I went here for lunch with the husband last weekend after wanting to try this place since they opened. I have been to Citizen Public House several times and liked it very much. So why did it take me so long to get to the Gladly? Well...they have almost the same exact menu as CPH....not sure why....if you are going to have the same menu, why have a different name? Well, anyway, we got around to trying it last weekend at lunch time and it was sort of a let down. The place had a few people in it, but not many. I got the wagyu french onion burger and husband got the BLT no aioli. Well, we get our food and my burger is ok, but his BLT had aioli....the waitress hadn't written down the order, so that may have been the issue. We preceded to wait for like 6-7 min for her to come by so he could ask her to remake the sandwich (he's allergic to eggs, so wiping it off wouldn't really suffice). She took it back without issue, but in the meantime, we've been sitting 6-7 minutes with my food getting cold. Then it took another 10 to get the sandwich back, so by that time my food was soggy and kind of cold. Not sure what this restaurant was thinking since most people don't want to eat their meal while their dining companion watches and then sit and watch them eat later, but no comment was made by the waitress. The burger was nothing special, it tasted fine...it wasn't really french onion -y as it was supposed to have an onion sauce on it, but really just had plain onions on it. The salad it came with was tasty, it had figs, cheese,  and weird smokey almonds in it (which weren't awesome, but the rest was good). When the husband got his sandwich, he was kind of disappointed. The bacon was super thick cut...more like ham, so it was really flaccid and heavy....not really what you want when getting a BLT. Overall, the meal wasn't awesome, but there was a light at the end of the tunnel. I had seen that they had a special the night before for dessert (a banana chocolate pot of sorts), I asked if they had any left, and they did! Got one and it was delicious! I kind of loved it. Anyway, the dessert was the saving grace, but I don't think I would go back all that soon as I was pretty disappointed with the entrees and service.
4 If you're a single lady looking for a guy with a job, head to happy hour at The Gladly. On a recent Saturday night when I went there for dinner, there were dozens of good-looking guys who seemed to have it together - lots wearing suits, and many looking like they just came back from the country club.  Not that the eye candy is the only reason you should give The Gladly a try. It's a beautiful restaurant with good food and drinks, that's conducive to wiling away the night. Our two-and-a-half dinner and cocktail rendezvous went by in a breeze, and thankfully, we never felt pressure from the wait staff to hurry up. Lingering and enjoying every sip and savory moment is encouraged here.  It's no surprise the spot, like Blue Hound Kitchen in downtown Phoenix, is filled with chicness - it's in the Biltmore area, a stone's throw away from Senator John McCain's rumored penthouse mansion. The menu is definitely pricey, but I made a meal out of a salad and still left full. You could split some of the less expensive dishes and walk away satisfied, for sure.  I had a Farmer's Punch cocktail ($11), made with Absolut Pear vodka, Calvados brand, lemon juice, honey and quince syrup, Fee Brothers barrel-aged bitters, and lemon peel. It was really refreshing and a little sweet. It didn't taste overly alcohol-y, and I'd recommend it.  For appetizers, our table ordered the Roasted Brussels Sprouts ($10), with corn grits and truffle oil. Like the EVO salad I recently tried at EVO in Scottsdale, this dish will make anyone a Brussels sprouts believer. I liked them on top of the grits, which gave the dish a variety of textures and flavors. It was a really generous and filling portion, too.  My pal also got the Vietnamese Pepper Shrimp ($16), with tomato and a sticky rice cake. It looked and smelled great.  His fiancée got the Original Chopped Salad ($12), which I've already tried at Cowboy Ciao and Citizen Public House. She interestingly subbed the salmon for chicken, and the rest of it looked the exact same as I've had before. There's a reason this legendary salad is on several Valley menus - try it at least once to see what the hype is about. It even has its own Facebook page at www.facebook.com/theoriginalchoppedsalad.  For my meal, I ordered the Burrata Caprese ($12), with Burrata mozzarella. I have to say, I'm not as big of a fan of Burrata as I am traditional mozzarella, simply because of the texture. Burrata is made with cream, so it's a much softer texture than traditional mozzarella. I did love the fresh basil and tomatoes, though, and the balsamic vinaigrette was delicious, too.  My pal also got the Honey Glazed Steelhead ($26), which seemed to be a generous portion.  We tried a tasty dessert, an apple tart topped with ice cream. It was more than enough to share with three people after that massive feast, and the tart was cooked to perfection. I'd say it's worth the splurge, for sure.  The main menu items range from $15-$36, with salads and appetizers up to $16. Head there for happy hour daily from 3-6 p.m. for half-priced beer and appetizers, and $5 glasses of wine. It's a fun place for people watching and gives Phoenix a New York City vibe (just like nearby bar Merc Bar, one of my favorites in the Valley for its cozy lighting and romantic atmosphere.)
3 The three stars are primarily due to the wonderful staff. If I could split  rating, they would get a five. The food however is quite "heavy" and somewhat greasy. If you are a fan of clean and refined food you may want to dine elsewhere . That being said, the squash soup was simple and delicious .
5 We are frequent Citizen Public House diners and heard about The Gladly. Very similar but has its own uniqueness.  Food is modern american and very flavorful.  Great ambiance and fantastic wait staff. They are knowledgeable about the menu and drink selection. Fabulous addition to the Biltmore area!
4 FINALLY, a place near home that serves up good cocktails. I wound up here solo a few weeks ago after putting some drunk day-drinkers to bed. I'd heard good things about this place and just wanted a chill place to enjoy some good, hand-crafted cocktails. I was not disappointed.  The guys working the bar are exactly what I expect from an upper-range establishment: they can chat you up with some witty conversation, they know their product well, and true mixologists, they can throw together something exactly to your liking if nothing on the menu suits you.  Their cocktails are perfectly balanced and they are not "foo-foo" cocktails either because after two, I knew I needed to move a little closer to home. The place is dimly lit and sexy with good music. They have a late night menu, so I'm thinking a nightcap is on the agenda soon.  I am very happy that these guys are nearby and highly recommend. I will update my review when I've sampled the menu. But in the mean, well done on the drinks.
4 I haven't gotten around to writing a review in a looong time. Nothing has been that particularly great or bad but last night was different. Had a really good dining/drinking experience there last night. MUCH thanks to Brian behind the bar for excellent cocktails, good recommendations and just outstanding service in general. The one thing that absolutely needs to be singled out was the chicken. Yes, that's right, the chicken. It came with a chimichurli sauce and was as good a chicken dish as I have ever eaten. Even the potatoes that came with it were spot on. Also had the brussel sprout appetizer which was just great (could have been a slightly larger portion). Also, those cocktails were on a whole different level than other places. We will be back again soon and thank you once again Brian!!
5 A jewel box of a restaurant! I heard good things about The Gladly, so we decided to meet friends for dinner there last night. Until we arrived, I did not realize they had taken over the old Ruth Chris space.  I did know that it was the sister restaurant of Citizen Public House, so I had high expectations.  As the hostess escorted us, past THE AMAZING LOOKING BAR, I wanted to yell, "Wait, let's just hang out there!" But arriving at our table, I was not disappointed.  The elevated dining room gives a feeling of privacy, but still allows it's diners to check out what is going on around them.   Cocktails last night were Negroni's On Tap, followed by a bottle of Hearst Ranch Petite Sirah, suggested by our waiter, Tim, and all was good in the world.  Of course, we ordered a couple of The Original Chopped Salads to share. Three orders of Pan Seared Scallops (incredibly sweet and bacon-y) and one order of Coffee Charred Short Ribs, we were an incredibly happy table of diners. An Apple Tartlet and Buttermilk Bread Pudding for dessert was just over the top.  I appreciate that the menu indicates Gluten Free items and was able to help with a dairy intolerance substitution.  All around a great meal and a fun evening.  We will be back!
5 Holy moly would I GLADLY come back to the Gladly again!  The Hubs and I celebrated out anniversary this past weekend by having a fabulous meal at this fine establishment.  Everything, I mean EVERYTHING about our dining experience was amazing.  Between the awesome drinks, tasty food, restaurant ambiance and great service this place nailed it.  I really cannot remember the last time I had a meal that was just so perfect, hence the five star rating.  Upon entering the restaurant we were immediately seated (we had a reservation) and the hostess and the waiter even wished us a Happy Anniversary, which was a nice touch.  Tim, our waiter, was excellent... very knowledgeable, helpful, and friendly.  He guided us to the best drinks and food based on our preferences.  I had the berry cocktail and thought it was one of the best, if not the best drink I've had in a long time.  I can't remember the drink my Husband had, but he absolutely loved it.  For food, we shared the smoked cheese fondue, chopped salad, and coffee crusted short ribs.  Each course was great.  The salad, as you can see from all the reviews here on yelp is sooo... good.  The cheese fondue came with the perfect dippers... pork butt, crispy bread, and pears.  The short rib was cooked to perfection and accompanied by greens, this barley concoction that was creamy and delish, and a blueberry heaven sauce.  For dessert we shared the bread pudding and it was the perfect end to our wonderful meal.  Honestly, I cannot say enough about the Gladly.  Basically, I would GLADLY drop $100+ regularly for a meal this good.  Check out this gem, you certainly will be GLAD you did!
2 Bar seemed busy. We arrived around 5:30-6, very few people there, but within an hour was very busy.  The decor is super boring. We sat up some steps to the back in a smaller area where the only decor was the tables/chairs, the crappy indoor/outdoor carpet and a mural of bookshelves. No mirrors, no pretty flower arrangements... how about NOT carpet? It's not a Pizza Hut!  Anyway, food was ok, they had a great venison dish that night.  They had some pretty tasty cocktails too. But our server ruined it. Our table was only about 1.5 feet from the wall, and he felt the need to walk THAT way every time he came to check on us- which felt like every 5 minutes.    There are plenty of other places nearby to go for better service, food and atmosphere. Oh, and they had a very small parking lot out front, with no valet. We found out later there is a large parking area around the corner and up a ramp down the street....tough to find unless you "know".  Best part? Our view of the skyscraper next door all lit up at night. Made us feel like we were downtown.
5 Went here last night. I'll review on a few different points.   1.  Service. My guy Nathan was fantastic. He was very attentive and on it. A small delay happened and before I could even bring it to his attention, he noticed and came to the table with a refresh on wine and brought me an amazing cocktail prepared table side. On the house because of the food delay. Fantastic.   2.  Food. Superb. Great tastes and textures. Fantastic mashes of flavors in my entree. I ordered the special. A 18ounce ribeye with a habenero risotto with white beans and homemade sausage and grilled asparagus. Seriously. De-frickin-licious. Spicy but fantastic.   3. Decor/restaurant design. Meh. They tried to be new and hip and trendy but the decor lacks depth and texture. The wall with the painted bookshelves and painted wall sconces on it is awkward and out of place and reminds me of an Olan Mills back set of the cheesy mid 80's family portrait we have all tried so hard to forget ever happened.   In conclusion, add some design to the building. Change NOTHING else. LOVE this place. Will go back.
5 Love the Gladly crew!  We stopped in to say hello to our friend Bernie and he surprised us with a new dessert that is going in the menu soon. A mouthwatering apple cake and marscipone ice cream with a dulce de leche sauce... Oh my goodness! Love at first taste!
5 My favorite place in Phoenix.   Chris makes the most amazing cocktails in the city. Just tell him what you like and poof! He'll make  you something delicious.   As for the food, also amazing and unique. Ask for the special because it usually rocks.   I never get tired of going here as it is the best restaurant in Phoenix!
5 Fig something cocktail was delicious.  Also, it was in this business building.  I think there was was cult thing going on in one of the rooms.  10 points for originality.
5 I've been wanting to try the Gladly since it opened in the Biltmore and on Valentine's Day, my wish came true.  My significant other and I went here for our dinner date.   We had reservations and arrived a few minutes early.  We were seated promptly.  We sat in the area of the restaurant they call "The Library" which is decorated with paintings of books and a quiet, smaller room overlooking the restaurant - this book-aficionado absolutely loved the ambiance!   The menu:  it was pre-fixed for Valentine's Day, but we still had a good sampling of the foods offered.  For appetizers, the boyfriend had The Original Chopped Salad, which was fantastic. It's so good, it even has it's own facebook page!  www.facebook.com/theoriginalchoppedsalad.   Seriously?!   haha.  I am not a salad person ( I can't eat lettuce) but even so, this is something that I would order in the future.  I had the butternut squash soup, which was warm and flavorful.  I loved the pepitas served on top - a nice, unique AZ style twist.   For dinner, I had the pan seared scallops.  They were sweet and savory, cooked to absolute perfection.  I love scallops and these are definitely some of my favorites!  They were complemented with sweet corn grits, I have never had anything like this before - they were so delicious, I had to refrain from licking my plate!    We wrapped up dinner with some blueberry bread pudding.  I then had to refrain the bf from licking the plate for this dish. haha.  Luckily, we maintained our composure and left with very satisfied bellies. The portions were ample but not huge, the prices were what I would expect for a fancy dinner out on the town at the Biltmore - we call it upper middle-brow dining perhaps?  It's a great place for a special occasion.    Enjoy!
4 Second time to this trendy place. The service is very good. The good is prepared perfectly. I think they could expand the menu just a bit. Will be craving the chop salad again before I head for home.
5 I made reservations at The Gladly for Valentines Day and I regret nothing.  The restaurant was very busy but did not feel crowded. There were balloons and flower petals on the table.  The Prix Fixe menu feature a selection of their dishes for what I thought was a pretty reasonable price.   I had the Chopped salad and it was amazing. The salmon was fresh and finely chopped and there was some freeze dried corn which provided a great texture to compliment the otherwise mushy conglomeration.  The Steak was superb. It was grilled to perfection with an herb butter.  The mashed potatoes and other accoutrement were equally delicious.  We tried both the available desserts.  One was a coffee brownie and the other was a bread pudding.  Personally, I'm a huge fan of brownies, but in this case i would say the Bread pudding stole the show.    I honestly can't wait to find an excuse to splurge just a little and come back here
4 Wow what a beautiful place.  Love the sinks in the restrooms what are they?  The food is excellent.  Great place.
1 This place is boring and tries way too hard.  The menu is limited. I had the "pigstrami" sandwich. It was ok, not great. I ordered the side salad but the brought me fries.  They couldn't leave the ketchup alone, it was gross because they tried to make it special.  I will never go back because there are too many other great options in the area.
5 This place is our new 'celebration dinner' restaurant.  After reading all of the amazing reviews, we went on a Wednesday at 5:30PM.  Everything about our experience was amazingly perfect.  We caught the end of their happy hour and stayed for three hours as we slowly worked our way through the menu.  Their cocktail menu is fantastic and our waiter was very knowledgeable on the drinks.  For example, 'The Fortified Fig' -- gin, port and fig syrup - WOW!!!  They also do the large round ice cubes at your table -- very cool to watch.  The smoked cheese fondue was fantastic.  Crab cakes -- incredible amount of crab.  Pork chop with chile bread pudding -- amazing.  Filet -- perfect medium rare.  Our dessert wasn't on the menu -- tres leche apple cake with mascarpone ice cream -- wow.  From our arrival until we walked out the door -- absolutely amazing experience.  :)
5 Walkable from the Ritz, a great surprise. Food was superb and the service was even better. Probably an up and comer as long as they stay on their game.   The chopped salad is a must. Make sure to inquire about creative cocktails. The bartender can pretty much make exactly what you're in the mood for. Enjoy!
5 The real focus is the bar.  This guy Brian ( I learn he's the lead mixologist/Cocktologist) made me one if the best unique cocktails I've had in a while.  Money in the bank.  Excellent grub; try the seared spicy tuna app.
5 I was not in a hurry to try The Gladly and now I wonder what was I thinking?? Great service and delicious food. Food so good I still think of it! We had the cheese fondue to start. You can go wrong with melted cheese. I had the scallops for my entree and they were the best scallop dish I have had in a long time. If it wasn't bad manners, I would have licked my plate clean.  The drinks were amazing, I love a cocktail that's not just a bunch of bottled syrups and commercial flavored vodka. The weakest dish was dessert, bread pudding. Nothing to write home about. I'm certainly going back!
4 nice play -- good food -- friendly bartender -- lots of folks from the trade drin there
4 Good food and nice ambiance.  LOVED their Thai Margarita - definitely try it if you like a little kick.  Fun place to meet friends (which we did) but would be a nice date place too.
5 Perfect date night location, makes you feel like you're in New York City! Absolutely love this spot. Try the fondu appetizer with pear and pork 'butt'... so delish. The drinks are all amazing, but my favorite concoction has been the Fortified Fig -- Gin, whipped up with something yummy including egg and cinnamon. I can't wait to swing by and check out their lunch menu.
5 This was the final portion of my Birthday Celebrations and I couldn't have been more pleased. I've been wanting to visit The Gladly since they opened. We went during HH so I could try as many things as possible because that's my favorite way to eat, lots of small plates.  I started with Super Yummy Nuts and the title doesn't lie, I could not stop eating them, they were crazy good, a little sweet, a little smoky and a little salty.  I then had the  Roasted Brussel Sprouts because they are my current favorite vegetables! They were cooked perfectly and so were the grits. I'm always a bit apprehensive about grits but these were creamy and very flavorful. Then to round things out I had smoked chicken wings and they were fantastic, I love smoked wings and these were amazing. Perfectly crispy skin with moist meat, perfect pairing.  My friend ordered the French Onion Waygu Burger which was amazing, definitely a must try for burger fans! But hands down the best thing we had was Bernie's Mac 'N Cheese, we're still talking about it and when we're going to come back and have it again. The pasta is cooked perfectly, it's not that mush that you get sometimes when you order mac 'n cheese. The flavors are more then just the smoked mozzarella and tomotoes that are listed. It's incredibly creamy and rich. If there is 1 thing that you have to order when you go, it's definitely Bernie's Mac 'N Cheese.  I don't remember the happy hour cocktail for that day, it was whiskey based with fruit and bitters, I just tried a sip and it was pretty good, I love the fact that they have different specialty cocktails based on the seasons.  The service was phenemonal on all ends, everyone was really friendly, it was the perfect ending to my birthday month.
5 Very rarely do I write a yelp review but this place is so good I feel compelled to. I've eaten here 3 times only off the late night menu. Each time I was amazed by how good the food was. The shrimp po boy and the chicken liver pâté were each two of the best things I've eaten in a long time and may be in my top ten ever. The late night menu items are reasonable priced around $10 but there's no sacrifice in food quality or size . If you want something amazing past midnight this is the place to go. Not to mention the bartenders are all friendly and knowledgeable on the menu. Also the late night menu changes every week so it's always something new . You could tell that a lot of experience and planning went into each dish. This place is a must try.
4 As fans of Citizen Public House, I was excited to try another of their offerings and they didn't disappoint.  We were there on a slow Saturday afternoon and they treated us like we were the only ones there.  Food was great and their drinks were good.  The bar inside is very cool and they have a lot of interesting stuff.  This would be a good place to sit at the bar and pick the bartender's brain about booze.
5 Their cocktails are unparalleled, and their food is wonderful for the price.  Flavors are predictable, but solid.  Five stars because of the innovative cocktails and amazing servers.  I heard they lost their mixologist, I hope it does not impact their quality.  I go here often for business lunches, and it is an underutilized asset.  This is a great place to convene, confer, and meet with business connections.
5 Everything was great. The wait staff was awesome and opinionated. Nate was opinionated in a good way and knew what he was talking about. Our waiter literally asked me to change two things that I ordered to something different and he was right on the money. If we were shooting arrows his suggestions were a bullseye. If playing golf it was a hole in one. If bowling a strike. If a musical composition a beautiful symphony. Sunshine on a cloudy day if you will.... Go here, if your lucky you will get Nate. If not, the food is still great. Go with the chopped salad and scallops.
5 I have yelped this place before....but this add-on service that Peg and I experienced today deserved another shout out!  When I heard that Chef Bernie et al were in the process of beginning their Sunday brunch at 9:00 AM...I almost wet myself. Ok ok, this can happen with anyone as they get older...but this is was a reaction on par with a YEAH!  You who have been to Gladly know how much of a good thing it is...the food, the service, the atmosphere....all of it are especially wonderful.  The brunch items are stellar...and for those of us who love getting  out on a Sunday morning and starting it in a most extraordinaire way...this will do it for you. (BTW...Crudo is on the short list of providing this type of experience as well). I digress....  Eggs Berniedict and Grits and Sausage followed one of our all time favorite appetizers...the pate. Andrew's selection of coffee is nothing short of genius...and actually, Peg and I rate a breakfast place for coffee as well as I'm sure many of you do as well. We had a bite of a cornbread waffle which was just incredible...and my bride does not typically enjoy waffles. These you really need to try. Pigstrami Hash will be next in line, I'm sure.  Our service (Samantha) was good, Nick was his usual attentive, gracious self, and Brian was always the comforting presence,  If you are up (relatively) early on Sunday...I would strongly recommend that you re-visit Gladly for a terrific way to give thanks... Dr. B
4 I have only been here for happy hour...and I LOVE IT! You can order a nice glass of wine for $5 and the appetizers...oh the food! The brussel sprouts over corn grits are absolutely perfect! I truly crave this dish on a weekly basis. I have also had the pate which is done very well and I really like the pickled onions they serve with it. The first time I sat on the patio and had great service, the second time I sat at the bar and the service had a bit to be desired. The bartender was so busy flirting with a set of very drunk girls...it took longer than it should to be acknowledged when we arrived.  I heard they just started brunch...can't wait to try it!
5 This is definitely the spot after a long day. Low key, great drinks, and great service. Its rare to find anyone that carries the whiskey selection that they do. I always start off with a few Red Breast served clean and then sober up with their Moscow Mule.   I havent had their food yet since I dont want it to ruin my perception of the place, but after reading these reviews I might venture outside of the alcohol.
5 My absolute favorite place to go. And now they serve brunch!! It doesn't get any better then that. I have tried just about everything they have and I've never been disappointed.
5 Found this place on yelp and GLADly that I did! Went during happy hour and stayed through dinner. Nathan, our waiter, is the best, most knowledgable, attentive server I have ever encountered. You are a lucky customer if you get him! The drinks, both non-alcoholic and alcoholic, are amazing and the bartender/mixologist is a genius in creativity. You have to go and experience their "own" juices, ginger beer and bitters. They are known for their chopped salad and I am endorsing that everyone try this! I must say I was expecting the portion to be a bit larger for the price... Maybe we can convince them to make this change!
5 This is a sister restaurant to Citizen Public House. The menus are similar but different enough to make a visit to both restaurants well worth it. I have tried several things on the menu here and have been really impressed with everything I have ordered. The drinks are excellent as well. The staff is very knowledgable and passionate. The other thing I really like about this place is the ambiance. It works well for a date, a night out with friends and family or for entertaining clients. You really can't go wrong. Anyone that is looking for a great meal in Phoenix should definitely visit The Gladly. Thanks for a great dining experience.
4 Went with a group of friends a couple months back on a Saturday afternoon. The service was spot-on and the food was delicious.  My friends and I enjoyed our time there out on the patio. Will be back to dine again.
3 I expected more from a Sunday brunch. It wasn't overly crowded, nor was there a wait. The service was slow and inconsistent and I had to do some deep digging to learn that there was a special barbecue on the patio and that the full lunch menu was available in addition to the brunch menus we stared at for 20 minutes waiting for one glass of wine. Once the food arrived, it was quality food. Spicy Chilaquiles and a well done pastrami.
5 This was my first visit to the gladly and it will not be my last.  I went with some friends from work for lunch and I was quite surprised at how they changed up the place from the old Ruth Chris building.  You are able to walk in with jeans and a tshirt and you don't feel out of place.    I ordered the wagyu burger and fries.  It came out cooked perfectly medium rare and on a fresh baked potato bun with some arugula and grilled onions.  The burger itself you can tell is flavored so it's not just a plain beef patty leaving you to get all the burger flavor from it's toppings.  Super juicy and probably one of the better burgers I've had in a good while.  The fries were great and had a nice salt and pepper coating to go with the home made ketchup.     Some of the menu items can be pricy but the burger with fries was 12 bucks and you pay more than that at zinburger.  Great place and highly recommend to give them a try
5 Decided to come here for a late snack, to have a couple appetizers and a drink. Started with the pepper shrimp and the burrata. Both dishes were fabulous, so we decided to order an entree to share. Had scallops that were cooked perfectly. Then, added another app because we are pigs. Had Brussels sprouts and they were absolutely delicious. Our server, Tim, was very knowledgeable, and made great suggestions. Overall, this has turned into one of our favorite spots.
5 From drinks to entree you cannot go wrong. This place is a great addition to the Biltmore area. Olive to start, who ever thought they'd be so good. Warm would even be better! Burrata with fresh greens and tomatoes, a great next course. Pepper shrimp, delicious and cooked perfectly and for dinner, the most amazing scallops!!! And I'm a New Englander!!! So, the food is amazing! Next you have to ask for Tim the server, great in every step if the way! Nick the manager stopped by, talked with us like we have known him for years!! I love the Gladly. Not to mention, this is only our second of many visits to come! You're fools for not dining here. Enjoy!!
5 I already can't wait to go back to The Gladly.  My husband and I planned to come here for dinner to enjoy Arizona's Restaurant Week promotion and menu offerings. Every single thing on the menu that we tried was incredible.  My husband's food kind of blew his socks off. The Original Chopped Salad - yeah, it totally lives up to the hype. And his duck meatloaf was huge and tasty. I enjoyed the greens salad and a vegetarian menu offering consisting of cauliflower risotto and a heaping pile of roasted vegetables, which were the most delicious roasted vegetables I've ever had, and exactly what I wanted for dinner.   Oh, and the desserts, yeah, they were incredible. I definitely liked the Blondie more than the blueberry bread pudding, but both were totally fantastic.  However, the best part of the dinner was the drink menu. The Gladly has over 200 kinds of whiskey and bourbon, so my husband and I started off with a couple of their signature cocktails (everyone, you HAVE to try the Gladly Manhattan - it's outstanding!), and then moved into tasting some of their whiskeys. And each whiskey is served with an ice ball that they form right at your table! It was SO cool, and such an awesome experience to partner with our cocktails!  I really want to go back immediately.
5 I was searching for a place to go for my boyfriend's birthday dinner and had no luck finding a decent restaurant.  I stumbled upon The Gladly and saw they had pretty much the most extensive whiskey list I've ever seen at a restaurant, not to mention the great reviews.  My boyfriend and I love whiskey so I made a reservation on the spot.   First impressions ranging from the decor to the mood lighting to the staff was exceptional. Our table was about 10 minutes past due but we didn't mind as we were hanging out at the bar enjoying ourselves and relaxing. The boyfriend had the Gladly Manhattan and it was probably one of the best Manhattan's we've ever had.  Delish!  They were running a Restaurant Week special which included an appetizer, entree and dessert for $30.  This was a phenomenal deal as one entree would cost you about $30 alone.  Done!  I ordered the Caesar salad, Chimichurri Chicken (which was perfectly cooked and so tender), and the White Chocolate Blondie for dessert.  Everyone at our table ordered something different and they all had nothing but great things to say about their food.  We had a little family style dinner going on as we all wanted to try what the other had.  Definitely not disappointed by any of the dishes, including the special "Pickled Pork Temple" dish that our friend ordered at the behest of our waiter who was so lively and friendly!   This restaurant was a fantastic choice for a birthday dinner and we will absolutely be back for more!  Thank you The Gladly for providing such a great atmosphere; the food, drinks and service was incredible!
5 One of my favorite regular spots! The best Brussels sprouts and scallops in Arizona, make sure to give them a try! The Gladly has a unique drink selection that are all amazing! Great atmosphere, and excellent management!
4 I am a huge fan of Citizen Public House so we decided to try out The Gladly during restaurant week.  I had the chopped salad, the scallops and the bread pudding.  Everything was top notch.  The chopped salad and scallops were just like the ones at Citizen Public House - excellent!  I also tried a their sazerac which was very tasty.  I like the location and the feel of Citizen Public House better, but this is a nice addition to the Biltmore corridor.
5 Could be contender for my favorite Phoenix restaurant.  Service - 5 Star - and that's hard to earn from me Decor/Environment -3/4 Stars - It's okay, but felt a bit cheap to me compared to it's peers.   Food - 5 star - Everything I ate was good to excellent.  Delightful. Value - 4 star - It's not cheap, but most are reasonable, especially happy hour.  Came here for restaurant week.  Very surprised to love it as much as I did.    Tip:  Happy Hour is outstanding.  $2.50 beers, $5 cocktail of day, $5 wine.  4-5 apps, full size portions, are $5.  My wife ordered the Pate appetizer to start, and it was a generous sized portion of pate.  She loved it.  I ordered the brussel sprouts on grits.  I'm not a huge fan of either ingredient, but this was a knock your socks off good combination.  Very pleased.  We both ordered the chopped salad.  It was just as others describe, very good.  Don't expect a big salad.  I ordered the chicken chimchurri and it was a generous piece of chicken, delightful flavors, and a great spicy kick.  Not too spicy, but just right.  I never order chicken dishes in restaurants, but was glad i tried.  My wife ordered the duck meatloaf and shared with our son.  Both loved it.  Nice portion.  Great flavors especially the grain it was on top of.  I had the bread pudding dessert, and I love bread pudding, but this was the weak point of the entire meal.  Was much more like a thick pie, and while very edible, not great by any means.  My wife got the blonde dessert, and it was excellent.  Says it tasted like great fudge.  Anyway, even with happy hour and restaurant week pricing, it was $60/person with tip.  Lots of food, and very good quality.  Not cheap, but IMO worth it.  We will be back, and would put this on par with St. Francis down the street... both are truly outstanding examples of Phoenix restaurants.
4 I like to think of it as having a slightly improved menu over its sister, the Citizen Public House, in a slightly less attractive setting.  Still has an incredible menu with the best salad known to man.
5 I have been wanting to try this restaurant for a while. It's not very close to home so the one time we had planned on going we were too tired to drive out there. So when a friend asked us to pick a restaurant for restaurant week, we chose the gladly. A handsome, well-dressed man met us in the parking lot to tell us the lot was full and to go around the corner. We did, and entered through the back door, where a delightful, friendly woman welcomed us in. We had a table near the window where we started with a round of drinks. The IPA tap had just been killed and the waiter suggested ordering a lager instead, which we thought was strange. But he was very nice and delightful and the service was very good. We all had the three course restaurant week tasting. We all got the topped salad, which is wonderful. And at the table we had a duck meat loaf, scallops, and steelhead. They were all delicious.
5 Awesome interior design.    What a great location with spectacular views.  The menu had lots of great items.  The chopped salad is a MUST have!  Went for breakfast also and it was fantastic.  Super waiting staff that were very attentive and personable.
4 While visiting Phoenix for work, my niece and I had dinner here during Restaurant week. Neither of us had been here before but she had heard good things about this place which I learned used to be a Ruth Chris steakhouse.  The interior was hip and modern. My niece ordered their version of the Chopped salad in which the ingredients are mixed tableside which was a nice touch. I had the pre-fixe $30 - 3 course meal opting for a Caesar Salad, Duck Meatloaf with foie gras mousseline, smoked cherry demi-glace, rosemary millet and topped with grilled asparagus spears and the choice of one of two desserts. The apps that we shared were the grilled brussel sprouts over corn grits and the pistachio chicken liver pate which were both great choices. I would have give this place the additional star if they had better dessert choices as part of the pre-fix restaurant week menu but overall The Gladly was a "Winner" in my book.
5 Super classy establishment!  Great drinks, good atmosphere for colleagues, a date , or friends.   Delicious food too, a lattice more pricey, but worth it.
4 all very nice....but if you are like us and like bread you have to ask for it...$12 salad and I have to ask for bread....at least they could ask the patron if they would like it...if they don't want to just serve it ...onlt issue noticed on the negative
3 (Lyrics - Alison Kraus - Baby, Now That I Found You)  Gladly now that I've found you I won't let you go I'll order food around you and I Yelp you so Gladly even though I think I'll try you now....  Gladly now that I've found you I won't let you go I'll order food around you and I Yelp you so Gladly even though I think I'll try you now I think I'll try you now oh, yeah  The owners of Citizen Public House presents; The Gladly, located in the Biltmore area just west of the shopping complex. The Gladly is a modern American restaurant with an urbanized feel. I came with my foodie gang, and yes like the cheesy Broadway gang we sing and dance....when you're a foodie, you're a foodie you're a foodie - wink! (See Westside Story)  We started with their signature Chopped Salad; I mean com'on it's the best in town and well known at that and if you don't know; know it now! Our appetizers concluded with the Lamb Ribs and Vietnamese Pepper Shrimp. I didn't really cared for the ribs since it was tad bit chewy and overcooked and there was nothing Vietnamese about the peppered shrimp. I miss my Chopped Salad....  Moving on to Entrees, I ordered their Pork Chops, which was tasty and nicely cooked to perfection. I like anything with a raisin compote! My friends around ordered their Duck Meatloaf and thought it was phenomenal! I tasted it and thought it somewhat gamey. Not my cup of tea. Overall, the experience of The Gladly was fun and the service was tops. I wasn't too blown away by the food, but it's not to say it's not worth the visit. - Enjoy!
4 The restaurant week menu was really a great deal.  I enjoyed the salad, the duck meatloaf, and the bread pudding.  Prior to dinner we hung out at the bar and sampled some happy hour fare.    Happy hour is a great deal.  They have a few apps in the $5-10 range and several drink specials including $2.50 drafts which is a great deal.  We had the sausage, cheese, and pretzel platter which was a perfect app to start out with.  The food is tasty here and I don't recall trying anything I didn't enjoy.  It is a little pricey (normally - not during restaurant week or at happy hour) and the atmosphere leaves a little something to be desired but it is definitely worth trying out if you're in the area.
2 I was pretty disappointed in my visit to the gladly... Definitely a fan of citizens public house, but not so much on the gladly.   I brought my husband here for his birthday about 2 weeks ago, we just moved to the area. I ordered the filet and he had the pork chop. Standard cinnamon-y/ apple flavor really not impressive. My steak was over cooked, the flavor was alright.... For the price of the meal, there are so many better options in the area. It was truly a let down, cph is sooooooo good!
4 Great experience overall. We had a very cool and friendly waitress. She really helped us pick some great items. We started with the brussels sprouts. They had grits on the bottom and they were divine. Also had the crab cakes which were very good and tasted fresh. Then I shared the chop salad with one other person. It was hands down one of the best salads I've ever had. So different and like nothing else.   Our main courses were all mediocre besides for my sister's scallops. I would definitely recommend getting drinks and appetizers at The Gladly. I had the mule and it was quite refreshing. I would definitely recommend this place but only for appetizers and drinks.
4 I get it. I totally understand why the original chopped salad (of cowboy ciao, citizen public house, and the gladly) has more Facebook friends than most celebrities.   It's legitimately the best salad you've ever had, considered having, or fathomed having. It's not even funny how delicious that salad was. It's not even a salad. It's a 7-piece harmonic masterpiece for your freaking mouth.   I think the gladly is nice. Great environment, great atmosphere, great service. I just think that the food might be slightly overrated given that a cowboy ciao meal blew me out of the water for half the price.
4 Food was good and the service was excellent.  Overall a positive experience.
4 What a great spot. If you love Citizen Public House you will love The Gladly. Cocktails were on point, service exceptional and the food... YUM! I had their Manhattan (or three), the Original Chopped Salad (of course) and the pork chop for my main course. All incredible! I hear the happy hour is a great spot for singles - haven't check it out myself but my sources are reliable! :)
5 Every single time I go in.... Exceptional service!! I can't get enough Of this place!!! The food, the drinks, the hospitality, and accommodations are just above and beyond! I highly recommend this sophisticated dining experience to all!!
5 The Gladly is delicious. I stopped in with some friends during restaurant week and we all decided to try different entrees to maximize our experience.  We all did start with the chopped salad, which I had never had. It was wonderful. I loved the combination of couscous, salmon, black currants, pepitas, and asiago.  One friend had the pan seared scallops - very nice. Another had the duck meatloaf - decadent and yummy. I had a special they added, which was the rockfish - amazing. I think my friends were a bit jealous of my dish and kept sneaking bites. Theirs were very good, but the rockfish was fantastic.  For dessert we had white chocolate blondie and the blueberry maple bread pudding. Blondie was excellent - not too sweet with a bit of lovely ice cream. Bread pudding was also nice and very rich.  Service was good. Restaurant is nice, modern, comfortable. I was really impressed and will definitely be back.
2 I was excited to try this restaurants but sadly my experience was disappointing. I thought the staff was very friendly and I enjoyed the decor, but the food was not good! We ordered the mac 'n cheese, which came with salsa on top. The flavors of the salsa were too overpowering for the cheese. My friend asked for his burger cooked medium and it came so under cooked the bun was bloody. Our server informed us that that is the way they cook them there. That's fine, but a little warning would have been useful. He returned the burger but was a little too disgusted to order something else. I ordered the yellow curry ramen and my first thought was that it tasted like Christmas. I'm not sure if it was Indian, Thai, or fruitcake inspired, but it was inedible. The overall opinion of my group was that the restaurant is trying to make their menu different but the flavor combinations don't quite work.
4 Glad I stopped by during restaurant week to take advantage of the deals. I like that they offered most of their regular dinner entrees with the same portion size.  Duck meatloaf was a bit gamey and pretty heavy. The scallops and rockfish special, though, were on point! Service was so-so. We asked our busboy for a lot of things and he happily helped us out. Don't know what happened to our actual waiter throughout the meal.  Clientele seemed a little stuffy, but this is the Biltmore area so I shouldn't be surprised. I'd maybe come by for happy hour, but not full dinner service.
5 Love their sister restaurant, Citizen Public House & I love their chef, owners managers & servers. As a patron & a client (group events) these sister restaurants are unique, refined & unmatched. Try their Original Chopped Salad, roasted Brussels sprouts on creamy corn grits, pan seared scallops, burgers you name it.  I love their creativity & use of rich tasting ingredients.  Their drinks are one-of-kind.  Again their creativity & uniqueness shines through. The Gladly is certainly worth a visit. Their staff is extremely knowledgable & makes you feel right at home.  Cheers to a memorable experience!
3 Four stars for the food but three stars overall due to the ambience. Decor is understated but could really use a bit more texture or greenery. The large windows that look to Camelback Road make it feel like you are sitting in a department store. Greenery outdoors appears limited to overgrown sage on the verge of becoming tumbleweed. What does any of this have to do with the food? Appetizers (lamb ribs, Brussels sprouts) were excellent and Gladly happily gives a robust serving go greens with their salads. The burrata was not memorable and appetizer quite cold. Salad dressings flavorful. Unfortunately, eats and ambience didn't encourage us to linger. However, for a Benjamin, we were full. Will concede that we caught additional eats elsewhere.
5 Great brunch spot. I got the eggs benedict (they spelled it BERNIEDICT) on a pretzel roll. They put cheese fondue on it instead of hollandaise sauce.  It was fabulous.  The orange sorbet mimosa was awesome too. I do not typically like OJ in my Prosecco but it did not taste too much like orange juice. I added lime and cranberry juice to it. My friends ordered the chopped salad. It looked fabulous. They had a mixology class going on in the bar.  I guess they offer that every once in a while.  My girlfriend said she would prefer a place with more of an "atmosphere."  I guess it wasn't busy enough for her to people watch. It was fine with me.
5 This was our first meal after we landed in Phoenix.  Booked an OT reservation and although it was in a business park area, there was a decent amount of people there.  Great ambiance, trendy bar, and very friendly staff.  I started off with a cocktail: Venice Shandy.  A little sweet, but refreshing.  Great way to start off a vacation!  We started off with their Original Chopped Salad.  The menu noted a Facebook page for it so we figured it must be good.  It's definitely not the typical chopped salad you'd expect.  This one had smoked salmon, freeze-dried corn, tomatoes, Israeli couscous, greens, tomato, sunflower seeds with black currants and they mix it in front of you with buttermilk dressing.  It's good enough to share for 2.  By far, this is the BEST salad I've had that I was dying for the recipe.  Sure enough, recipe found online: http://www.azfamily.com/community/blogs/arizona-cooking/Have-you-tried-Arizonas-State-Salad-231931881.html#recipe  For dinner, I had the Coffee Charred Short Ribs.  It came with barley, blueberry compote and spinach.  The dish itself was a pretty big portion, but after sharing with my husband, we finished it all.  The meat was really tender and it just fell off the bone.  It had some sweetness to it, but with a nice hint of coffee.  I also enjoyed eating the barley with the sauce that I couldn't stop eating it.  My husband had the Duck Meatloaf.  It was a hefty portion as well.  Went very well with the cherry glaze.    Overall, it was a great meal.  We definitely enjoyed our dinner while watching the dust storm outside.  The glass doors kept blowing in the wind.  Our server was friendly and was very knowledgeable about the history of the restaurant when we asked.  For a night out in town, come down for a good meal and tasty drinks!
4 I've taken my out of town visitors to this restaurant on several occasions, and each time it has been an eye opening experience. During the day, the restaurant is always quiet, clean, and highly organized. The indirect lighting penetrates their large windows at ease, and the brown-white interior adds both formality and definition to the modern outlook. It's a great place for lunch and small gatherings. I was thankful for fellow Yelpers Greg and Esther N. for coming to see me in Phoenix as we met here for early lunch.  The Super Yummy Nuts ($4) came with spiced and smoked almonds, cashews, and peanuts. The nuts were glazed and crystalized together with hints of spiced and smoked subtleties. This dish was a little expensive, but a fun item to have at the table.  The Butternut Squash Soup ($8) came with gorgonzola, currant relish, and pepitas. It had a thick creamy consistency to couple with a full-on butternut squash flavor. The bites of raisins and pumpkin seeds also added depth and texture. This little cup of soup can go a long way. I would love to have this again.  The Original Chopped Salad with Seared Tuna ($18), also known as the "State Salad", came with couscous, dry-freeze corn, arugula, raisins, seeds, tomato, seared tuna, and buttermilk dressing. This is one of their signature dishes. The tuna was nicely seared to go with rich and diverse representations of colors, flavors, and sharp and crisp textures. The flavors were then tied together by the finesse buttermilk dressing that came with the subtleties of lemon, basil, and garlic. Addictive and highly recommended.  The Roasted Brussels Sprouts ($10) came with charred Brussels sprouts sitting on top of creamy corn grits and a touch of truffle oil. The truffle oil was noticeable but not overpowering. The smooth corn grits came with outstanding texture, and so were the charred-flavored Brussels sprouts. The convergence of flavors had the Brussels sprouts front and center. I really enjoyed it.  The Pigstrami Sandwich ($12) came with cured and smoked pork butt, egg, Swiss cheese, Brussels sprout sauerkraut, Dijon, and rye bread. The diced pork butt was served savory, firm and nicely smoked. The Swiss was able to round out the pointed Dijon flavor. And again, the contrast of crisp and soft textures was a common theme across these dishes. It was outstanding.  The Chimichurri Chicken Breast ($14) came with buttermilk chicken, chili fingerling potato casserole, and egg. The chicken was tender and moist, but I wished the buttermilk flavor could be more noticeable in transit between the taste of the chili and egg yolk. The potatoes were firm and not over cooked. It was good, but not memorable.  The Berry French Toast ($10) came with fresh berries, berry compote, maple syrup, and vanilla whipped cream. The toast was easy to cut into, soft and crisp in all the right places. The toast itself carried enough flavor for me to keep the maple syrup to a minimum. The vanilla whipped cream made it addictive. It was enjoyable, but I wished they have a better selection of French Toast and other sweet options than this dish.  Service was very professional, attentive, friendly, and personable. There was an air of formality to add to the grand sophistication that ranged from the décor to each dishes. Both food and service were very consistent, nicely orchestrated; and they were very easy to work with when I talked about my dietary preferences and restrictions. Overall, the originality of their dishes and impeccable service made The Gladly a great place for bringing guests and visitors. I would love to return to try their dinner menu and Sunday brunch.
3 Nice place but was not terribly impressed.  Our waiter recommended the short ribs which were pretty good although would not put that as the first impression piece.
4 We took a trip Sedona way  For three hot nights And four days stayed  On our way home Stopped in Phoenix Met Daniel L Gladly he picks  Walked through the doors Nice ambience The air was cool Booth seats ensconced  Caught up with life Ate a nice lunch Our menu picks We loved a bunch  We ordered the Chopped Salad Also the Pigstrami We shared a cup of squash soup At the end we were happy  You know I'm glad!  I'm glad!  You know it! (really really glad) You know I'm glad!  I'm glad!  You know it! (really really glad) You know I'm glad!  I'm glad!  You know it! (really really glad) If a Yelper! didn't get my message right now I'm gonna say it once again I'm glad!  The word is out Chopped salad great Lickety split This salad ate  Nicely plated Light dressing poured The flavor mix We did adore  Shared cup squash soup Seeds, raisins topped Gulped spoonsful few Yet hard to stop  Pigstrami good Yet bit salty Langer's sandwich Is best to me.  The Gladly servers are trained well Helpful, thoughtful, polite In terms of the "lunch experience" The Gladly was out of sight!  You know I'm glad!  I'm glad!  You know it! (really really glad) You know I'm glad!  I'm glad!  You know it! (really really glad) You know I'm glad!  I'm glad!  You know it! (really really glad) If a Yelper! didn't get my message right now I'm gonna say it once again I'm glad!
4 The Gladly is an excellent addition to the area. As other note there are some similarities with citizen public house - I take that as a positive thing. Gladly service was excellent - top notch all around. Our cocktails were perfect. Our entrees - the ribs and the meatloaf - were good but not the most memorable aspects of our visit. Desert, I thought, was an afterthought at best.
